Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1537.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MINNESOTA PUBLIC RADIO.new text end new text begin $2,350,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $2,350,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for a grant to Minnesota Public Radio, Inc.: new text end new text begin (1) to create original on-air and digital programming, live events, and arts education opportunities and to amplify artistic, musical, historical, and cultural information and activities on multiple platforms that reach the entire state; new text end new text begin (2) for programming that enhances the artistic and cultural ecosystem across the state through partnerships with working artists, musicians, historians, and writers; new text end new text begin (3) to continue to grow representation of and support for Minnesota's communities of color and Indigenous communities in radio programming; and new text end new text begin (4) to support preservation of and public access to Minnesota's history through the Minnesota Public Radio audio archives. new text end